Hawaii statutes.
[§350-1.5] Authorization for color
photographs, x-rays, and radiological or other diagnostic examination.
(a) Any health professional or paraprofessional, physician licensed or
authorized to practice medicine in this State, registered nurse or licensed
practical nurse, hospital or similar institution's personnel engaged in the
admission, examination, care, or treatment of patients, and any medical
examiner, coroner, social worker, or police officer, who has before the person
a child the person reasonably believes has been harmed, shall make every good
faith effort to take or cause to be taken color photographs of the areas of
trauma visible on the child. If medically indicated, such person may take or
cause to be taken x-rays of the child or cause a radiological or other
diagnostic examination to be performed on the child.

(b) Color photographs, x-rays, radiological,
or other diagnostic examination reports that show evidence of imminent harm,
harm, or threatened harm to a child shall immediately be forwarded to the
department. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next